src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
|    Pos1     | Pos2      | Pos3      | POS switches (from-to)| Explanation
| --- | --- | --- | --- | ---
|  **+Der1** |            |            |      | Position tag, required
|             | **+Der2** |            |      | Position tag, required
|             |            | **+Der3** |      | Position tag, required
|  **+Der/htalle** |            |            | VV   | Passive, frekeventative
|  **+Der/lg** |            |            | VV   | Passive
|  **+Der/ijes** |            |            | NA   | Nomen agentis
|  **+Der/ihks** |            |            | VA   | (Handlernomen- tilbøyelig til å utføre den handlingen som grunnordet angir)
|  **+Der/les** |            |            | VA   | Intensive
|  **+Der/ldihkie** |            |            | VA   |
|  **+Der/ldahke** |            |            | VA   | Resultatnomen (?)
|  **+Der/ldh** |            |            | VA   | Attributt
|  **+Der/ht** |            |            | VV   | Causative
|  **+Der/l** |            |            | VV   | Subitive
|  **+Der/st** |            |            | VV   | Diminutive, Subitive
|  **+Der/d** |            |            | VV   | Continuative, Konative, Frequentative, Refleksive, Momentan
|  **+Der/Car** |            |            |      | -hts, Caritive, was Der/heapmi in sme
|  **+Der/htj** |            |            | NN   | Dim-cont, Frequentative
|  **+Der/Dimin** |            |            | NN   | Diminutive
|  **+Der/Rec** |            |            | NN   | Forholdsformer
|  **+Der/laakan** |            |            | AAdv | adverb
|  **+Der/laaketje** |            |            | AA   | adjektiv
|  **+Der/Comp** |            |            | AA   | adjektiv
|  **+Der/Superl** |            |            | AA   | adjektiv
|             | **+Der/vuota** |            | AN   | Noun
|             | **+Der/adte** |            | VV   | Frequentative, Kontinuativ
|             | **+Der/alla** |            | VV   | Frequentative
|             | **+Der/eds** |            | NA   | Attributt
|             |            | **+Der/PassL** | VV   | long only
|             |            | **+Der/NomAg** | VN   | Nomen Agentis
|             |            | **+Der/NomAct** | VN   | Nomen Actionis
|             |            | **+Der/ahtje** | VV   | Inchoative
|             |            | **+Der/InchL** | VV   | Inchoative

### Other, non-positional derivations

All non-positional derivations should be preceded by the following tag,
to make it possible to target regular expressions in all derivations in a
language-independent way:
just specify
```[+Der](+Der1 .. +Der5)```
and you are set.
* **+Der**:  Tag to precede any non-positional derivation

|   Derivation tag | POS switch | Explanation
| --- | --- | ---
|  +Der/PassS | VV | short passive only
|  +Der/A | NA | comparation of N's

## Tags for originating language

The following tags are used to guide conversion to IPA: loan words
and foreign names are usually pronounced (approximately) as in the
originating (majority) language. Instead of trying to identify the
correct pronunciation based on phonotactics (orthotactics actually),
we tag all words that can't be correctly transcribed using the SMA
transcriber with source language codes. Once tagged, it is possible
to apply different IPA conversions to each of them.
The principle of tagging is that we only tag to the extent needed,
and following a priority:

1. any untagged word is pronounced with native orthographic conventions
1. NNO and NOB have identical pronunciation, NNO is only used if
different in spelling from NOB
1. SWE has mostly the same pronunciation as NOB, and is only used
if different in spelling from NOB
1. Occasionally even SMA (the default) may be tagged, to block other
languages from being specified, mainly during semi-automatic
language tagging sessions
All in all, we want to get as much correctly transcribed to IPA
with as little work as possible. On the other hand, if more words
are tagged than strictly needed, this should pose no problem as
long as the IPA conversion is correct - at least some words will
get the same pronunciation whether read as SMA or NOB/NNO/SWE.

| Originating language tag | Originating language
| ------------------------ | -----------
 |  **+OLang/SME** | North Sámi
 |  **+OLang/SMA** | South Sámi
 |  **+OLang/SMJ** | Lule Sámi
 |  **+OLang/FIN** | Finnish
 |  **+OLang/SWE** | Swedish
 |  **+OLang/NOB** | Norw. bokmål
 |  **+OLang/NNO** | Norw. nynorsk
 |  **+OLang/ENG** | English
 |  **+OLang/HUN** | Hungarian
 |  **+OLang/RUS** | Russian
 |  **+OLang/UND** | Undefined
|  **+OLang/PARA** | parallelle navn, navnet skal ikke overføres til andre samisk språk

## Area tags

* +Area/SE = In Sweden
* +Area/NO = In Norway

## Triggers for morphophonological rules
* **X2 : Trigger for e:0 before suffix i**:  manne > mannine
* **X3**:  Trigger for e->i in even syllabic verbs Du3
* **X4**:  Trigger for e->i in even syllabic verbs Du2 & Pl12
* **E2**:  insert e ! Fjern denne.

### Morphophonemes and Sámi letters

* e9  twol rule override, so that e doesn't turn into i infront of j
* o9  twol rule override,  so that o doesn't turn into u infront of j

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
* **»7**: Literal »
* **«7**: Literal «
* **%[%>%]**: Literal >
* **%[%<%]**: Literal <

## Lexeme disambiguation tags
* **+Hom1**:  Homonymy
* **+Hom2**:  Homonymy

## Stem variant tags
* **+v1**:  variant 1
* **+v2**:  variant 2
* **+v3**:  variant 3
* **+v4**:  variant 4
* **+v5**:  variant 5
* **+v6**:  variant 6
* **+v7**:  variant 7

## The clitic boundary mark

A multichar that usually just goes to zero:

* **`|»`**

## Umlaut and diphthong simplification triggers

|                    Trigger | Explanation
|                        --- | ---
|  %^DISIMP | diphthong simplification
|  %^COMPDISIMP | diphthong simplification in comparatives
|  %^COMPDISIMP2 | diphthong simplification in comparatives, type 2
|  %^COMPDISIMP3 | diphthong simplification
|  %^PLCDISIMP | diphthong simplification in ACCRA-names
|  %^NOMAGieDISIMP | diphthong simplification for NomAg ie stems
|  %^1UML | a-uml, like 1sg prs, perf.part of båetedh/V-I, and ill sg of -ie nouns
|  %^2UML | dark e, as 3sg prs & perf.part of tjearodh/V-II, and ill sg of -oe nouns
|  %^3UML | adj Umlaut oeh:an
|  %^3sUML | a-uml in 3sg prs of V-IV (roehtedh - ruahta)
|  %^3dUML | ie-uml in 1du & 3pl prs of V-IV (roehtedh - ruehtien)
|  %^iæUML | not used
|  %^iUML | i-uml in pret of V-I (båetedh - böötim)
|  %^PASSUML | Short passive Umlaut Rx->R5
|  %^didhUML | Der/d Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words
|  %^htjidhUML | Umlaut für der/htjidh derivations
|  %^adteUML | Umlaut für Der/adte and Der/alla derivations
|  %^aLATUS | Latus-Umlaut for -ie stems
|  %^uLATUS | Latus-Umlaut for -oe stems
|  %^ConsDel | Stem consonant deletion in front of Der/PassL
|  %^ILLELA | Stem vowel changes in Illative an Elative
|  %^PLGENPLCOM | Stem vowel changes in final from e -> i, and withoaut -j-
|  %^COMESS | Stem vowel changes in ACCRA-names
|  ∑ | Symbol used before `#` and `-` in dynamic compounds, and only there. Used to block optional conversion of word boundaries to spaces for error detection in grammar checkers. That is, dynamic compounds are not allowed to be written appart for error detection, only lexicalised ones. This is done to reduce the amound of ambiguity in the raw analyses to an amount we can cope with.

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using the following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

|                         Flag | Explanation
|                          --- | ---
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @R.ErrOrth.ON@

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

|                        Flag | Explanation
|                         --- | ---
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the two previous ones to block compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
|  @U.CmpHyph.FALSE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @U.CmpHyph.TRUE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @C.CmpHyph@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

|                         Flag | Explanation
|                          --- | ---
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

The following flag diacritics are used by the grammar checker.

|                         Flag | Explanation
|                          --- | ---
| @R.SpellRlx.ON@ | Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
| @D.SpellRlx.ON@ | Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
| @C.SpellRlx@ | Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
| @P.Pmatch.Loc@ | Used on multi-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch where in the form/analysis the token should be split.
| @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ | Used on single-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch to backtrack by reanalysing the substrings before and after this point in the form (to find combinations of shorter analyses that would otherwise be missed)
